Washington statutes.
RCW 35.13.171

Review board—Convening—Composition.

Within thirty days after the filing of a city's or town's annexation resolution pursuant to RCW 35.13.015 with the board of county commissioners or within thirty days after filing with the county commissioners a petition calling for an election on annexation, as provided in RCW 35.13.020, or within thirty days after approval by the legislative body of a city or town of a petition of property owners calling for annexation, as provided in RCW 35.13.130, the mayor of the city or town concerned that is not subject to the jurisdiction of a boundary review board under chapter 36.93 RCW, shall convene a review board composed of the following persons:

(1) The mayor of the city or town initiating the annexation by resolution, or the mayor in the event of a twenty percent annexation petition pursuant to RCW 35.13.020, or an alternate designated by the mayor;

(2) The chair of the board of county commissioners of the county wherein the property to be annexed is situated, or an alternate designated by him or her;

(3) The director of commerce, or an alternate designated by the director;

Two additional members to be designated, one by the mayor of the annexing city, which member shall be a resident property owner of the city, and one by the chair of the county legislative authority, which member shall be a resident of and a property owner or a resident or a property owner if there be no resident property owner in the area proposed to be annexed, shall be added to the original membership and the full board thereafter convened upon call of the mayor: PROVIDED FURTHER, That three members of the board shall constitute a quorum.

[ 2023 c 470 s 2015; 2009 c 549 s 2010; 1995 c 399 s 35; 1985 c 6 s 2; 1973 1st ex.s. c 164 s 14; 1965 c 7 s 35.13.171. Prior: 1961 c 282 s 2.]

NOTES:

Explanatory statement—2023 c 470: See note following RCW 10.99.030.